Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0614

Waiver of notice of meeting.

(1) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may waive any required notice of a meeting of the board of directors in a record before, during, or after the meeting.

(2) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director's participation in a meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting unless the director objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the director's arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote in favor of or otherwise assent to the action taken at the meeting.

[ 2019 c 37 s 614.]